Washington statutes.
RCW 11.12.220

No interest on devise unless will so provides.

No interest shall be allowed or calculated on any devise contained in any will unless such will expressly provides for such interest.

[ 1965 c 145 s 11.12.220. Prior: 1917 c 156 s 26; RRS s 1396.]